Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1437.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law not to be
codified in the Oklahoma Statutes reads as follows:
This act shall be known and may be cited as the “President
Donald J. Trump Physical Fitness Act”.
SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 11-103.9c of Title 70, unless
there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:

A. The State Department of Education shall establish guidelines
for school districts in this state to assess the overall fitness of
students and encourage physical activity and healthy habits by
administering the Presidential Fitness Test. The physical fitness
test guidelines shall be based on the recommendations of the
President’s Council on Sports, Fitness, and Nutrition, which was
reconstituted by Executive Order 14327. The guidelines shall
include:
1. Training for personnel to administer the test;
2. Exemption guidelines for students with disabilities, medical
conditions, or other factors that would impact their ability to
complete the test; and
3. An option for a parent or legal guardian of a student to opt
the student out of the test.
B. Upon development of the physical fitness test
recommendations by the President’s Council on Sports, Fitness, and
Nutrition and the subsequent establishment of guidelines by the
State Department of Education, school districts in this state shall
administer the Presidential Fitness Test to students using the
guidelines established pursuant to subsection A of this section or
from nationally accepted fitness testing programs designed for
school-aged children that test cardiovascular fitness, muscular
strength and endurance, flexibility, and body composition.
C. School districts shall utilize student performance results
on the Presidential Fitness Test to:
1. Promote the physical and mental benefits of daily movement,
exercise, and good nutrition;
2. Modify physical activity opportunities offered to students;
and
3. Encourage participation in physical activities available to
students inside and outside the school setting.
ENR. S. B. NO. 1437 Page 2

D. The State Board of Education may promulgate rules to
implement the provisions of this section.
SECTION 3. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.
ENR. S. B. NO. 1437 Page 3

Passed the Senate the 14th day of May, 2026.
Presiding Officer of the Senate
Passed the House of Representatives the 6th day of May, 2026.
Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
Received by the Office of the Governor this ____________________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
Approved by the Governor of the State of Oklahoma this _________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
_________________________________
Governor of the State of Oklahoma
OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
Received by the Office of the Secretary of State this __________
day of __________________, 20 _______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
ENR. S. B. NO. 1437 Page 4